District of Columbia statutes.
2-1219.32

Repealed

Transfer of functions, duties, and powers of the Redevelopment Land Agency to the RLA Revitalization Corporation.

Repealed.

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 30b
as added Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-188, § 2(c), 49 DCR 6516
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 103(a), 55 DCR 1689